New York, session 2025-2026, A10296.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 202-m to 2 read as follows: 3 § 202-m. Leave of absence for menopause granted to employees. 1. An 4 employer shall grant no less than five days of leave of absence in any 5 twelve month period to an employee who suffers from menopause symptoms. 6 2. An employer shall not retaliate against an employee for requesting 7 or obtaining a leave of absence under this section. 8 3. This section shall not prevent an employer from providing leave for 9 menopause in addition to leave allowed under any other provision of law. 10 This section shall not affect an employee's rights with respect to any 11 other employee benefit otherwise provided by law. 12 4. The commissioner is hereby authorized and directed to establish any 13 necessary guidelines, including requirements for notice, request and 14 approval of leave, and documentation, for the timely implementation of 15 the program. 16 § 2. The commissioner of labor, in consultation with the commissioner 17 of health, shall develop workplace guidance for understanding and effec- 18 tively and compassionately managing menopause challenges in the work- 19 place. Additionally, such commissioners shall create a public awareness 20 campaign normalizing menopause and its potential impact on workers. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 22 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14559-01-6